Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Taxes and Licenses.

Sec. 43.75.010.
Fisheries business licenses. [Repealed, § 13 ch 79 SLA 1979.]

Sec. 43.75.011.
Fisheries business license.

A person engaging or attempting to engage in a fisheries business or in an activity described in AS

43.75.100

shall first apply for and obtain a license as provided in AS

43.75.020

.

The commissioner may assess a civil penalty against a person required to have a license under (a) of this section who fails to obtain the license. The civil penalty for a violation of (a) of this section may not exceed $5,000 the first time a civil penalty is assessed, $10,000 for a second assessment, $15,000 for a third assessment, $20,000 for a fourth assessment, and $25,000 for a fifth or subsequent assessment. The commissioner may not assess a person more than one civil penalty for a violation of (a) of this section in a 30-day period.

Proceedings to suspend or revoke a license under AS

43.75.020(b)(3)(B)

are governed by AS 44.62.

History.

(§ 3 ch 79 SLA 1979; am §§ 1, 2 ch 150 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2005)

Legislative history reports. —

For the Governor’s transmittal letter in connection with the enactment of subsection (b) by § 2, ch. 150, SLA 1990 (CSHB 400(Fin)am), see 1990 House Journal, p. 2011.

Sec. 43.75.015.
Fisheries business tax.

A person engaged in a fisheries business is liable for and shall pay the tax levied by this section on the value of each of the following fisheries resources processed during the year at the rate set out after each:

salmon canned at a shore-based fisheries business — four and one-half percent;

salmon processed by a shore-based fisheries business, except salmon for which the tax is due under (1) of this subsection, and all other fisheries resources processed by a shore-based fisheries business — three percent;

fisheries resources processed by a floating fisheries business — five percent.

Instead of the taxes levied by (a) of this section, a person who processes a developing commercial fish species is liable for and shall pay a tax equal to

one percent of the value of the developing commercial fish species processed by a shore-based fisheries business during the year; and

three percent of the value of the developing commercial fish species processed by a floating fisheries business during the year.

A person engaging or attempting to engage in a fisheries business who first actually and physically processes the fishery resource, or a person who purchases a fishery resource that is processed from a person excluded by AS

43.75.017

from liability for the tax, is liable for and shall pay to the department the entire tax imposed by this section. In determining this tax liability, the person may deduct from the value of the fishery resources processed the value of fishery resources that are canned or processed for other fisheries businesses. A person taking the deduction authorized by this subsection shall report all information relating to the deduction in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.

Instead of the taxes levied under (a) or (b) of this section, a person who processes a fishery resource under a direct marketing fisheries business license is liable for and shall pay a tax equal to

one percent of the value of the developing commercial fish species processed during the year; and

three percent of the value of a commercial fish species not subject to (1) of this subsection.

For purposes of determining the value of a fishery resource on which a tax is levied under this section, the department may establish a presumption of market value for a fishery resource in a region or market area based on a volume weighted average of market values for the fishery resource reported on returns filed under this chapter by fisheries businesses operating in the region or market area. A taxpayer who appeals an assessment of taxes based on a presumption of market value determined by the department under this subsection may rebut the presumption with substantial evidence of

the prevailing price paid to fishermen for the fishery resource of the same kind and quality by fisheries businesses in the same region or market area where the fishery resource was taken, if the taxpayer holds a direct marketing fisheries business license under AS

43.75.020(c)

and the fishery resource on which the tax is levied is processed under that license; or

the true market value of the fishery resources if the taking of the fishery resource is done in a company-owned or company-subsidized boat operated by employees of a fisheries business, a subsidiary of the fisheries business, or a parent company of the fisheries business.

History.

(§ 3 ch 79 SLA 1979; am §§ 5, 6 ch 117 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 147 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For tax on fisheries business, see 15 AAC 75, art. 1.

For tax imposed on acquisition of fisheries resources, see 15 AAC 75, art. 2.

Sec. 43.75.017.
Exclusion from fisheries business tax.

A person is not liable for the fisheries business tax under AS

43.75.015

when the fishery resource is processed aboard a fishing vessel if

the vessel is operated as a commercial fishing vessel under a valid commercial fishing license;

the fishery resource is not processed beyond heading, gutting or cleaning, freezing, and glazing;

the fishery resource was caught by the vessel; and

the fishery resource is sold to a fisheries business licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 7 ch 117 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 147 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For tax on fisheries business, see 15 AAC 75, art. 1.

Sec. 43.75.018.
Fisheries business education credit.

A person engaged in a fisheries business is allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter for contributions of cash or equipment accepted for

direct instruction, research, and educational support purposes, including library and museum acquisitions, and contributions to endowment, by an Alaska university foundation, by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association, or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state;

secondary school level vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a school district in the state;

vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a state-operated vocational technical education and training school;

a facility by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state;

Alaska Native cultural or heritage programs and educational support, including mentoring and tutoring, provided by a nonprofit agency for public school staff and for students who are in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state;

education, research, rehabilitation, and facilities by an institution that is located in the state and that qualifies as a coastal ecosystem learning center under the Coastal America Partnership established by the federal government;

the Alaska higher education investment fund under AS

37.14.750

;

funding a scholarship awarded by a nonprofit organization to a dual-credit student to defray the cost of a dual-credit course, including the cost of

tuition and textbooks;

registration, course, and programmatic student fees;

on-campus room and board at the postsecondary institution in the state that provides the dual-credit course;

transportation costs to and from a residential school approved by the Department of Education and Early Development under AS

14.16.200

or the postsecondary school in the state that provides the dual-credit course; and

other related educational and programmatic costs;

constructing, operating, or maintaining a residential housing facility by a residential school approved by the Department of Education and Early Development under AS

14.16.200

;

childhood early learning and development programs and educational support to childhood early learning and development programs provided by a nonprofit corporation organized under AS 10.20, a tribal entity, or a school district in the state, by the Department of Education and Early Development, or through a state grant;

science, technology, engineering, and math programs provided by a nonprofit agency or a school district for school staff and for students in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state; and

the operation of a nonprofit organization dedicated to providing educational opportunities that promote the legacy of public service contributions to the state and perpetuate ongoing educational programs that foster public service leadership for future generations of residents of the state.

The amount of the credit is 50 percent of contributions.

Each public college and university shall include in its annual operating budget request contributions received and how the contributions were used.

A contribution claimed as a credit under this section may not

be the basis for a credit claimed under another provision of this title; and

when combined with contributions that are the basis for credits taken during the taxpayer’s tax year under AS

21.96.070

, AS

43.20.014

, AS

43.55.019

, AS

43.56.018

, AS

43.65.018

, or AS

43.77.045

, result in the total amount of the credits exceeding $1,000,000; if the taxpayer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $1,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.145

.

The credit under this section may not reduce a person’s tax liability under this chapter to below zero for any tax year. An unused credit or portion of a credit not used under this section for a tax year may not be sold, traded, transferred, or applied in a subsequent tax year.

To qualify for a credit under this section, equipment must be appraised consistent with regulations adopted by the department to determine the value of the contribution for purposes of this section.

In this section,

“dual-credit student” means a secondary level student in the state who simultaneously earns college and high school credit for a course;

“nonprofit organization” means a charitable or educational organization in the state that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code);

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

;

“vocational education” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 58 SLA 1987; am § 53 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 71 SLA 1991; am § 8 ch 21 SLA 1994; am § 21 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 20 ch 81 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 86 SLA 2000; am §§ 19, 20 ch 46 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 48 SLA 2008; am §§ 41, 43, 45, 47 ch 92 SLA 2010; am § 10 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am § 11 ch 6 SLA 2012; am § 22 ch 74 SLA 2012; am §§ 42, 44 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018; am §§ 26 — 30 ch 101 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of section in 2025. —

Under secs. 21 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

Revisor's notes. —

In 1991, to harmonize the amendments made by chs. 21 and 71, SLA 1991, the words “by an Alaska” were inserted before “university foundation” in (a) of this section.

In 2002, in (d) of this section, “ AS

43.65.018

” was substituted for “ AS

43.75.018

” to correct a manifest typographical error in
ch. 86, SLA 2000.

In 2010, in (d)(2) of this section “AS

21.96.070

,

21.96.075

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.070,

21.89.075

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of
AS 21.89.070 and

21.89.075

.

In 2012, in (d)(2) of this section, “ AS

43.20.145

” was substituted for “ AS

43.20.073

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of
AS

43.20.073

.

In 2010 and 2018, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; subsection (e) was enacted as (f) in 2010 and subsection (f) was enacted as (g) in 2018.

In 2014, the paragraphs in subsection (g) were reorganized to maintain alphabetical order; paragraphs (g)(1) and (2) were originally enacted as (3) and (4).

In 2018, “AS

21.96.075

,” was deleted from paragraph (d)(2) to harmonize the repeal of AS

21.96.075

by sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018, effective January 1, 2019, with the changes made by ch. 101, SLA 2018.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 15, SLA 2014, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective January 1, 2009, rewrote this section.

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, inserted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” in (a)(4), added (a)(5) and (a)(6), and made a related change.

The first 2012 amendment, effective March 24, 2012, in (f)(1) [now (g)(1)], substituted “AS

43.20.014

” for “AS

14.03.126

”.

The second 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, added (a)(7), and made stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), added “, or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state” at the end of (a)(1) and (a)(4), in (a)(4), deleted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” following “a facility”, added (a)(8) — (12), and made a related change; in (f) added (f)(3) and (f)(4) [now (f)(1) and (2)]; in (g) added (g)(1) and (2) [enacted as (f)(3) and (4)].

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “contributions of cash or equipment” for “cash contribution”; in (a)(1) and (4), inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation”; in (b)(2), substituted “75 percent” for “100 percent” at the beginning; in (d)(2), twice substituted “$1,000,000” for “$5,000,000”; added (g) [now (f)].

The 2018 amendment,
effective January 1, 2021, rewrote (b).

Sec. 43.75.019.
Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund contribution credit. [Repealed, § 25 ch 46 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 43.75.020.
Application for license.

Application for a license shall be filed with the department and accompanied by an annual fee of $25. A separate annual fee is required for each plant specified in the application covered by the license. The application must contain the name of the applicant, the line of business to be licensed, place of business, and other facts that the department prescribes. The applicant shall state that the applicant, as a condition of obtaining and maintaining the license, agrees to pay

the taxes levied under this title, and that the applicant will make a return and pay the taxes at the time provided by law;

any seafood marketing assessment levied under AS 16.51;

contributions imposed under AS 23.20 (Alaska Employment Security Act);

any administrative penalties assessed under AS

18.60.093

for a violation of a provision of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

;

any applicable fishery sales, use, or severance taxes imposed by a municipality in the state; and

any industry fee levied under a fishing capacity reduction program authorized under 16 U.S.C. 1861a (Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act).

Upon receipt of an application in proper form under (a) or (c) of this section, accompanied by the annual fee, the department shall issue the license if the

applicant has paid in full, including interest and penalties, the following:

taxes levied under this title; and

any assessments under AS 16.51;

department has not received notification from the Department of Labor and Workforce Development that the applicant has failed to pay in full

an assessment of delinquent contributions that is final under AS

23.20.205(c)

or

23.20.220(c)

; or

an administrative penalty that is final under AS

18.60.093

or

18.60.097

; and

department has not received a copy of

a final judgment obtained against the applicant for unpaid fishery sales, use, or severance taxes imposed by a municipality in the state;

a final administrative determination against the applicant from a municipality in the state for unpaid fishery sales, use, or severance taxes imposed by the municipality; the administrative determination must be accompanied by a certification by the municipality that the municipal administrative process is consistent with constitutional requirements of due process and that the applicant has exhausted all administrative remedies under the applicable municipal administrative process; or

a final administrative determination against the applicant from the National Marine Fisheries Service for unpaid industry fees levied under a fishing capacity reduction; the administrative determination must be accompanied by a certification by the National Marine Fisheries Service that the federal administrative process is consistent with constitutional requirements of due process and that the applicant has exhausted all applicable administrative remedies.

Instead of a license issued under (a) of this section, the department may issue a direct marketing fisheries business license to a licensed commercial fisherman who processes fishery resources caught using a vessel that does not exceed 65 feet in overall length and is owned or leased by the commercial fisherman. The licensee may place into commerce in the state and outside of the state processed or unprocessed fishery resources caught using the vessel described in the license. Fishery resources that are caught using the vessel and owned by the licensee from the time of harvest through sale, as defined by the department by regulation, may be processed by the licensee on the vessel, at a shore-based facility, or by means of custom processing services obtained by the licensee. An application for a direct marketing fisheries business license shall be filed with the department and accompanied by an annual fee of $25. A separate direct marketing fisheries business license and annual license fee are required for each vessel on which processing is performed. The application must state the name and address of the applicant, the fishery resources for which the applicant holds a commercial fishing entry permit or interim-use permit or quota share, a description of the vessel and each shore-based facility where the applicant will process fishery resources, and other information that the department prescribes by regulation. The application must state that the applicant, as a condition of obtaining and maintaining the license, agrees to pay the taxes, assessment, employment security contributions, and penalties as set out in (a)(1) — (5) of this section. A person who holds a direct marketing fisheries business license may not under that license (1) purchase fishery resources for resale or processing for sale; or (2) process fishery resources for another licensed commercial fisherman or for a fisheries business licensed under this chapter. In this subsection, “licensed commercial fisherman” means a natural person who holds a commercial fishing entry permit or interim-use permit issued under AS 16.43 or a quota share issued under federal law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 82 SLA 1949; am § 93 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 150 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 147 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 3 ch 74 SLA 2010)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 24, SLA 2005 (SB 124), proposing the 2005 amendments to this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 441 — 442.

Sec. 43.75.030.
Filing return and payment of tax.

A person subject to the tax shall file a return stating the value of fisheries resources processed during the license year, computed as required by this chapter, and such other information as the department prescribes by regulation. The return must show the license number and must be signed by the taxpayer or an authorized agent, under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree. If a receiver, trustee, or assign is operating the property or business, that person shall file the return for the person. A tax due on the basis of such a return shall be collected in the same manner as if collected from the person of whose business the receiver, trustee, or assign has custody and control.

The return shall be made on a calendar year basis and submitted to the department before April 1 after the close of the calendar year.

The department may adopt regulations for the granting of a reasonable extension of time for filing and may grant an extension of time for filing.

Except for tax paid monthly under AS

43.75.055(c)(1)

, the tax shall be paid before April 1 after the close of the calendar year.

Every person engaging or attempting to engage in a business for which a license is required under this chapter shall keep records, make statements under oath, file returns, and comply with all regulations that the commissioner may adopt.

When the department considers it is necessary, it may require a person, by notice served upon the person, to file a return, make such statements under oath, or keep and display to it such records as it considers sufficient to show the tax for which the person is liable. If a person fails to file a return as prescribed by law or by regulation, or makes, wilfully or otherwise, a false or fraudulent return, the department shall make the return from the information that it can obtain. A return made by the department is prima facie good and sufficient for all legal purposes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 82 SLA 1949; am §§ 2, 3 ch 146 SLA 1962; am §§ 5, 6 ch 79 SLA 1979; am § 54 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 2003; am § 27 ch 42 SLA 2006; am § 6 ch 20 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For tax on fisheries business, see 15 AAC 75, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, in (b), deleted “the basis of the” preceding “calendar year”, inserted “basis and submitted” preceding “to the department”, deleted “at Juneau” following “the department”, and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 43.75.032.
Tax credit for scholarship contributions.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 61 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 43.75.034.
Tax credit report. [Repealed, § 8 ch 79 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 43.75.035.
Salmon and herring product development tax credit.

History.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 57 SLA 2003 ch 57 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 43.75.036.
Salmon utilization tax credit. [Repealed, § 20, 34, ch 61, SLA 2014.]

Sec. 43.75.050.
Violations and penalties. [Repealed, § 4 ch 94 SLA 1976; § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976; §§ 45, 46 ch 113 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 43.05.220 and 43.05.290.]

Sec. 43.75.055.
Security for collection of taxes.

An applicant for a license under this chapter shall, in or with the application, state under oath the amount of each of the products that the applicant expects to produce during the license year. The applicant shall further state the extent of lienable real property owned by the applicant in the state against which the tax may be collected and other information with respect to description, location, and value of the property that the department prescribes.

Except as provided in (c) and (e) of this section, if the lienable value of the property is not equal to three times the amount of the tax for which the applicant will probably be liable under this section, the department may not issue the license until the applicant files with the department a surety bond approved by the attorney general in a penal sum equal to twice the probable amount of the tax for which the applicant will be liable, conditioned upon payment of the tax in full when due, with interest and penalties if not paid before delinquency.

An applicant may elect to avoid the requirements of (a) and (b) of this section if the applicant

files a report as prescribed by the department and pays the taxes due under this chapter on or before the 15th day of the month following the month in which liability for the payment of the taxes was incurred;

pays the taxes and assessments for which the applicant is liable under AS 16.51, AS 43.76, and AS 43.77 on or before the 15th day of the month following the month in which the liability for the payment of the taxes or assessments was incurred;

remits to the department the taxes and assessments that the applicant is required to collect under AS 43.76 on or before the 15th day of the month following the month in which the taxes or assessments were required to be collected; and

either

files a bond in the amount of $50,000; or

provides the department with proof that the applicant is the owner of lienable real property in the state of a value of at least $100,000.

A bond filed under (c) of this section must be conditioned upon the payment of the taxes under (c)(1) of this section in full when due.

The department may waive the bond requirement under (b) or (c) of this section if the applicant posts other security in the form of collateral acceptable to the department or prepays the estimated tax.

An applicant that fails to pay amounts due under this section is subject to civil penalties set out under AS

43.05.220

.

Real property, a surety bond, or other security being used to secure payment of the tax for the year preceding the application year may also be used to secure payment of the estimated tax for the application year if the security is acceptable to the department and the applicant has not failed to pay a tax under this chapter in a timely manner during any of the three years preceding the application year.

History.

(§ 4 ch 84 SLA 1967; am § 8 ch 79 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2001; am §§ 2, 3 ch 55 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 2005)

Secs. 43.75.060 — 43.75.095.
Cold storage and other fish processors. [Repealed, § 13 ch 79 SLA 1979.]